test/src/morphology/V-leed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - leeˊd: # Verb 'to be' - full paradigm
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leäm
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: leäk
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lij
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: leäˊp
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [leäˊped, leˊped]
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [lie, liâ, lee] 
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prs+4: leät

     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: leˊjjem
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: leˊjjiǩ
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [leäi, leei, läi]
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: leeim
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: leeid
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: leˊjje
     leeˊd+V+Ind+Prt+4: leˊjješ

     leeˊd+V+Pot+Sg1: leˊžžem
     leeˊd+V+Pot+Sg2: leˊžžiǩ
     leeˊd+V+Pot+Sg3: [leežž, leež]
     leeˊd+V+Pot+Pl1: [leˊžžep, leˊžžim]
     leeˊd+V+Pot+Pl2: leˊžžveˊted
     leeˊd+V+Pot+Pl3: leˊžže
     leeˊd+V+Pot+4: leˊžžet
     leeˊd+V+Pot+ConNeg: leˊžže

     leeˊd+V+Cond+Sg1: leˊččem
     leeˊd+V+Cond+Sg2: leˊččiǩ
     leeˊd+V+Cond+Sg3: leˊčči
     leeˊd+V+Cond+Pl1: [leˊččim, leˊččep]
     leeˊd+V+Cond+Pl2: leˊččid
     leeˊd+V+Cond+Pl3: leˊčče
     leeˊd+V+Cond+4: leˊččeš
     leeˊd+V+Cond+ConNeg: leˊčče

     leeˊd+V+Imp+Sg2: leäk'ku
     leeˊd+V+Imp+Sg3: leäǥǥas
     leeˊd+V+Imp+Pl1: leäk'kap
     leeˊd+V+Imp+Pl2: [leäk'ku, leäk'kveˊted]
     leeˊd+V+Imp+Pl3: leäk'kaz
     leeˊd+V+Imp+ConNeg: leäk'ku
     leeˊd+V+PrsPrc: leˊddi
     leeˊd+V+PrfPrc: [leämmaž, leämma, leäm]

#     leeˊd+V+Imp+ConNeg: iˊlleäkku
#     leeˊd+V+ActEss: åårmen
#     leeˊd+V+Action: åårram
#     leeˊd+V+PrfPrc: [iˊlleäm, iˊllääm, jeäˊlääm]
#     leeˊd+V+Pass+PrfPrc:
#     leeˊd+V+VAbess: åårǩâni
#     leeˊd+V+GerTemp:
#     leeˊd+V+GerInstr: 
